Illinois, session 104th, HB4992.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Child Abuse Notice Act is amended by 5changing Sections 5 and 10 and by adding Section 3 as follows: 6    (325 ILCS 6/3 new)7    Sec. 3. Definitions. As used in this Act:8    "Gun shop" means the retail premise of a federally 9licensed firearm dealer where the business of selling, 10transferring, or otherwise dealing in firearms or firearm 11ammunition is conducted.12    "Federally licensed firearm dealer" has the meaning 13ascribed to that term in Section 1.1 of the Firearm Owners 14Identification Card Act. 15    "Public library" means a tax-supported public library 16established by or as a governmental unit that is authorized to 17levy a tax for library purposes or supports the library at 18least in part from local tax revenues. "Public library" 19includes: (i) any library established or maintained by a city, 20village, incorporated town, township, county, or library 21district under the Illinois Local Library Act, the Village 22Library Act, the Public Library District Act of 1991, or 23Division 5-38 of the Counties Code; (ii) any library converted   HB4992- 2 -LRB104 17955 KTG 31392 b1to a library district under the Village Library Conversion 2Act; and (iii) any library sold or leased in accordance with 3the Library Property Sale Act. "Public library" also includes 4any library that receives no income from local tax sources but 5does receive ongoing income from other sources at least 6sufficient to qualify for per capita grants provided in 7Section 8.1 of the Illinois Library System Act, and provides 8library service to the residents of a city, village, 9incorporated town, township, or county.  10    (325 ILCS 6/5)11    Sec. 5. Posted notice required. Each of the following 12businesses and other establishments shall, upon the 13availability of the model notice described in Section 10, post 14a notice that complies with the requirements of this Act in a 15conspicuous place in all restrooms open to the public, or in 16another conspicuous location in clear view of the public and 17employees where similar notices are customarily posted:18        (1) Hotels and motels.19        (2) Entertainment facilities or sporting facilities 20    that are indoor structures with a legal occupancy of at 21    least 5,000 persons.22        (3) Tattoo and body piercing establishments. 23        (4) Primary airports, as defined in Section 47102(16) 24    of Title 49 of the United States Code.25        (5) Intercity passenger rail or light rail stations.  HB4992- 3 -LRB104 17955 KTG 31392 b1        (6) Bus stations.2        (7) Truck stops. As used in this Act, "truck stop" 3    means a privately owned and operated facility that 4    provides food, fuel, shower, or other sanitary facilities, 5    and lawful overnight truck parking.6        (8) Emergency rooms within general acute care 7    hospitals, in which case the notice may be posted by 8    electronic means.9        (9) Urgent care centers, in which case the notice may 10    be posted by electronic means.11        (10) Public libraries. 12        (11) Gun shops. 13(Source: P.A. 103-813, eff. 1-1-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25.) 14    (325 ILCS 6/10)15    Sec. 10. Form of posted notice.16    (a) The notice required under this Act shall be at least 8 171/2 inches by 11 inches in size, written in a 16-point font, 18except that when the notice is provided by electronic means 19the size of the notice and font shall not be required to comply 20with these specifications. 21    (b) The No later than 6 months after the effective date of 22this Act, the Department of Children and Family Services, in 23consultation with an accredited Children's Advocacy Center, 24shall develop a model notice aimed toward children under 18 25that provides information on what constitutes physical and   HB4992- 4 -LRB104 17955 KTG 31392 b1sexual abuse, and how to report such abuse, and contact 2information for the National Suicide Prevention Lifeline 3(988), the Crisis Text Line, and either the Safe2Help Illinois 4helpline or a local suicide prevention hotline, or both. The 5Department of Children and Family Services shall make the 6model notice available for download on the Department's 7Internet website.8    (c) The notice shall be printed in English, Spanish, and 9in one other language that is the most widely spoken language 10in the county where the establishment is located and for which 11translation is mandated by the federal Voting Rights Act, as 12applicable. This Section does not require a business or other 13establishment in a county where a language other than English 14or Spanish is the most widely spoken language to print the 15notice in more than one language in addition to English and 16Spanish.17(Source: P.A. 103-813, eff. 1-1-25.)